Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
Court and Judges

21.010.
Court consists of seven judges.
[Repealed]

21.020.
Appellate court districts. [Repealed.]

21.021.
Appellate court districts — Election of judges — Jurisdiction. [Repealed.]

21.030.
New counties, part of which district.
[Repealed]

21.040.
Election of judges, when held. [Repealed].

21.050.
Power of court and judges — Writs and process. [Repealed.]

21.055.
Reversal or modification of judgments. [Repealed.]

21.056.
Procedure for reversal or modificatoin of judgment — Method of taking and perfecting. [Repealed.]

21.060.
Appellate civil jurisdiction of Court of Appeals. [Repealed.]

21.070.
Amount in controversy, how ascertained. [Repealed.]

21.080.
Appeals in cases involving less than $2500. [Repealed.]

21.085.
Time limit on right of appeal by persons under disability. [Repealed.]

21.090.
Terms of court — Absence of judges. [Repealed.]

21.100.
Effect of equal division of court. [Repealed.]

21.110.
Travel expense allowance or equivalent for judges and commissioners. [Repealed.]

21.120.
Enforcement of mandates. [Repealed.]

21.130.
Damages upon affirmance. [Repealed.]

21.135.
Opinions to be delivered. [Repealed.]

21.140.
Appeals in criminal cases. [Repealed.]